District of Columbia statutes.
21-315

Custodian’s expenses; compensation; bond.

(a)

A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian’s duties.

(b)

Except for one who is a transferor under section 21-304, a custodian has a non-cumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

(c)

Except as provided in section 21-318(f), a custodian need not give a bond.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278

History

1981 Ed., § 21-315.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 15 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

Editor's Notes